Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.090

Property appointed—Powers of revocation or appointment.

(1) Property appointed by the will of the decedent to or for the benefit of the slayer or abuser shall be distributed as if the slayer or abuser had predeceased the decedent.

(2) Property held either presently or in remainder by the slayer or abuser, subject to be divested by the exercise by the decedent of a power of revocation or a general power of appointment shall pass to the estate of the decedent, and property so held by the slayer or abuser, subject to be divested by the exercise by the decedent of a power of appointment to a particular person or persons or to a class of persons, shall pass to such person or persons, or in equal shares to the members of such class of persons, exclusive of the slayer or abuser.

[ 2009 c 525 s 9; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.090. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 9.]